Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ast_ES.dic
acertar/ADH
acopellar/ADH
acorrer/ADH
acoyer/ADH
adormir/ADH
aducir/ADH
aferir/ADH
afogar/ADH
afoyar/ADH
ainar/ADH
alcontrar/ADH
alentar/ADH
almorzar/ADH
alvertir/ADH
amagostar/ADH
amarellar/ADH
amentar/ADH
amoblar/ADH
amorgar/ADH
amosar/ADH
ampliar/ADH
andar/DH
anochar/ADH
antainar/ADH
anteponer/ADH
apapellar/ADH
apertar/ADH
aponer/ADH
aportar/ADGH
aposentar/ADH
apostellar/ADH
aprobar/ADH
arrastrellar/ADH
arrecender/ADH
arrecoyer/ADH
arremendar/ADH
arrendar/ADH
arreprender/ADH
arrevolar/ADH
arromper/ADH
arruar/ADH
asalir/ADH
asedentar/ADH
asestar/ADH
asosegar/ADH
ataramellar/ADH
ataventar/ADH
atestar/ADH
atornellar/ADH
atrayer/ADH
avalir/ADH
averiar/ADH
azarcellar/ADH
azolar/ADH
azurdellar/ADH
buir/DH
caltener/DH
capellar/DH
carramellar/DH
cayer/DH
cocer/DH
comenzar/DH
componer/DH
concebir/DH
condescender/DH
confesar/DH
conocer/DH
consiguir/DH
constituir/DH
construir/DH
contar/DH
contradicir/DH
contrayer/DH
contribuyir/DH
convertir/DH
coproducir/DH
corresponder/DH
corroyer/DH
costar/DH
creer/DH
decayer/DH
deducir/DH
dentar/DH
derregar/DH
derroyer/DH
desalendar/DH
desamoblar/DH
desandar/DH
desaponer/DH
desarrendar/DH
desatornellar/DH
descaltener/DH
descolgar/DH
desconcertar/DH
desconsolar/DH
descoñocer/DH
desdentar/DH
desempedrar/DH
desenduvellar/DH
desengodobellar/DH
desenredar/DH
desentender/DH
desentestar/DH
desestar/DH
desferver/DH
desmentir/DH
despertar/DH
desplegar/DH
desprender/DH
desrabadellar/DH
destituir/DH
destorcer/DH
destruir/DH
desvergonzar/DH
detener/DH
dexoncer/DH
disminuir/DH
disonar/DH
distrayer/DH
dixerir/DH
dormir/DH
emparentar/ADH
empelgar/ADH
empezar/ADH
empoder/ADH
emporcar/ADH
empoyar/ADH
emprobar/ADH
encender/ADH
encollar/ADH
encomendar/ADH
encomulgar/ADH
encoyer/ADH
encubertar/ADH
enduvellar/ADH
engrescar/ADH
engullir/ADH
enllamorgar/ADH
enlluxir/ADH
enredar/ADH
enreventar/ADH
ensellar/ADH
enteabrir/ADH
entecoyer/ADH
entender/ADH
entestar/ADH
entexer/ADH
entornellar/ADH
entreabrir/ADH
entretexer/ADH
entrullir/ADH
esbatuir/ADH
escalentar/ADH
escarrapellar/ADH
escazobellar/ADH
escolgar/ADH
escombullir/ADH
escomponer/ADH
esconder/ADH
escontradicir/ADH
escornar/ADH
escorruxir/ADH
escostruñir/ADH
escribir/ADH
escriturar/ADH
escurecer/ADH
facer/DH
liofilizar/DH
llabegar/DH
llaboriar/DH
llaceriar/DH
lladiar/DH
llagar/DH
llagrimiar/DH
llambicar/DH
llambiscar/DH
llambroniar/DH
llamiar/DH
llampaniar/DH
llampurdiar/DH
llancar/DEH
llancir/DH
llanxir/DH
llapariar/DH
llapurdiar/DH
llaregar/DH
llarimexar/DH
llarpir/DH
llastimar/DH
llastrar/DH
llaviar/DH
llazar/DH
llazcar/DH
llegar/DH
llenar/DH
lletrificar/DH
llexicalizar/DH
lliberalizar/DH
llibertar/DH
lliciar/DH
lligar/DH
llimpiar/DH
lliofilizar/DH
llizar/DH
llociar/DH
llombrigar/DH
lloquiar/DH
lloramingar/DH
lloramiscar/DH
lloramugar/DH
lloriar/DH
llorimisquiar/DH
lloriscar/DH
llover/DH
lloviquiar/DH
llovisquiar/DH
llubrificar/DH
lluriar/DH
localizar/DH
macexar/DH
machicar/DH
maciar/DH
macolar/DH
maderar/DH
madriar/DH
magnetizar/DH
maizar/DH
malcochar/DH
malcriar/DH
malfacer/DH
maliar/DH
mallograr/DH
malquerer/DH
malvender/DH
mancorniar/DH
maniobrar/DH
manufacturar/DH
manxir/DH
maraviyar/DH
martellar/DH
mentir/DH
moblar/DH
morder/DH
mostrar/DH
moyar/DH
mucir/DH
nacer/DH
negar/DH
ñegar/DH
oponer/ADH
pacer/DH
pegar/DH
penzar/DH
percollar/DH
persiguir/DH
pervertir/DH
peyestrar/DH
plañir/DH
poder/DH
poyar/DH
predicir/DH
preferir/DH
presentir/DH
presuponer/DH
prever/DH
producir/DH
proponer/DH
prostituyir/DH
provenir/DH
pruyir/DH
rancollar/DH
rayer/DH
reabsorber/DH
rebuir/DH
rebuyir/DH
recalentar/DH
recibir/DH
recomendar/DH
reconocer/DH
reconstruir/DH
recordar/DH
recubrir/DH
reelixir/DH
refertar/DH
refonder/DH
remendar/DH
remoyar/DH
reñacer/DH
repetir/DH
repoyar/DH
rescocer/DH
resonar/DH
restrellucir/DH
retinxir/DH
retrañir/DH
revertir/DH
rir/DH
ronquellar/DH
saber/DH
satisfaer/DH
ser/DH
soarrendar/DH
sobreseer/DH
solar/DH
soltar/DH
soponer/DH
sorrir/DH
soterrar/DH
sustituyir/DH
tarabellar/DH
tar/DH
tender/DH
torcer/DH
trayer/DH
trescordar/DH
tresoyer/DH
triñir/DH
unxir/ADH
verter/DH
ximelgar/DH
yustaponer/DH
